Nevada, session 83, SB22.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 360A.060 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
360A.060 Unless a different penalty or rate of interest is
specifically provided by statute, any person who fails to pay any tax
or fee required by chapter 365, 366 or 373 of NRS or NRS
445C.330 or 590.120 to this State or a county within the time
required, shall pay a penalty of [not more than] 10 percent of the
amount of the tax or fee that is owed, [as determined by the
Department,] in addition to the tax or fee, plus interest at the rate of
1 percent per month, or fraction of a month, from the last day of the
month following the period for which the amount or any portion of
the amount should have been reported until the date of payment.
H
-
*SB22*